Utah statutes.
63C-9-201.   State Capitol Preservation Board -- Creation -- Membership.

(1)  There is created the State Capitol Preservation Board.

(2)  The board shall consist of the following 11 members:

(a)  the governor, or the lieutenant governor acting as the governor's designee;

(b)  the president of the Senate or the president's designee, who shall be a member of the Senate;

(c)  the speaker of the House of Representatives or the speaker's designee, who shall be a member of the House of Representatives;

(d)  the state treasurer;

(e)  the state attorney general;

(f)  two members of the Senate appointed by the president of the Senate, one from the majority party and one from the minority party;

(g)  two members of the House of Representatives appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives, one from the majority party and one from the minority party;

(h)  the chief justice of the Supreme Court or the chief justice's designee, who shall be a member of the Supreme Court; and

(i)  the state historic preservation officer.



Amended by Chapter 256, 2006 General Session

